Wyoming, session 2025, SF0195.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 11-52-101 and 11-52-102 are created
to read:
CHAPTER 52
SMALL BUSINESS EMERGENCY BRIDGE LOAN PROGRAM
11-52-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this chapter:
(i) "Office" means the office of state lands and
investments;
(ii) "Financial institution" means a bank or
credit union having a place of business within this state
and that is chartered under state or federal law;
(iii) "Program" means the small business
emergency bridge loan program created in this chapter;
(iv) "Director" means the director of the office
of state lands and investments.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0195
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
11-52-102. Small business emergency bridge loan
program; eligibility; requirements; account.
(a) The small business emergency bridge loan program
is hereby created to provide short-term bridge loans to
Wyoming businesses after declared natural disasters.
(b) The office of state lands and investments shall
administer the program. The state loan and investment board
shall:
(i) Promulgate any rules necessary to implement
the program;
(ii) Establish a process by which financial
institutions may register to administer and process
emergency bridge loans issued under the program;
(iii) Develop an application for emergency
bridge loans, including specifying the documentation
required to apply, and provide applications to
participating financial institutions for distribution;
(iv) Review all applications and recommendations
from financial institutions to ensure that emergency bridge
loans are approved and made in accordance with this
chapter;
(v) Oversee the disbursement and repayment of
funds from emergency bridge loans.
(c) Subject to available funding, small business
emergency bridge loans shall be made and disbursed in
accordance with all of the following:
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0195
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) Before bridge loans shall be available under
this chapter, the governor shall declare that a natural
disaster has occurred and shall designate the counties in
which the natural disaster has occurred. For purposes of
this paragraph, the governor may declare a natural disaster
for purposes of making loans available under this section
upon the failure of infrastructure, including but not
limited to roads, bridges, dams and irrigation
infrastructure. Upon this declaration, businesses located
in the designated counties in which the natural disaster
has been declared may apply for emergency bridge loans
under this chapter;
(ii) Emergency bridge loans shall be made only
to businesses that:
(A) Are physically located and doing
business in Wyoming and are physically located within the
area in which the governor has declared that a natural
disaster has occurred;
(B) Were established and in operation
before the declared natural disaster occurred;
(C) Have one (1) or more persons who own
not less than fifty percent (50%) of the business, who can
apply for the loan and who shall serve as guarantor for the
loan. Any person or persons applying for a loan under this
chapter for a business shall have a credit score of not
less than five hundred fifty (550) and shall not be on
probation or parole at the time of application;
(D) Not be engaged in the business of loan
packaging, offering or providing short-term rentals,
speculation, multi-sales distribution, gaming, investment
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0195
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
or lending or any activity that violates state or federal
law.
(iii) Applications for emergency bridge loans
shall be filed with a financial institution registered with
the office to participate in the program. Upon receipt of a
complete application and all required documentation, the
financial institution shall review the application and
documentation to determine whether the business qualifies
for an emergency bridge loan under this chapter and shall
forward a recommendation to the office whether to approve
or reject the loan and any terms or conditions that should
be included for the loan;
(iv) Upon receipt of a recommendation from a
financial institution, the office shall, not later than
five (5) business days after receiving the recommendation,
review the recommendation and ensure that the applicant
qualifies for a loan. Upon determining that an applicant
qualifies under this chapter, the director may approve the
application and, if approved, shall disburse funds from the
account created in subsection (f) of this section to the
financial institution for disbursement to the loan
applicant or, if requested by the loan applicant or if the
financial institution is unable to accept the funds, for
disbursement directly to the loan applicant, and specify
any terms and conditions that shall be included as part of
the loan agreement. Loans approved by the director shall
not require subsequent approval by the state loan and
investment board.
(d) Emergency bridge loans issued under this chapter
shall:
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0195
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) Require an origination fee of two percent
(2%) of the loan amount, to be distributed to the financial
institution for processing the loan. The office shall pay
one percent (1%) of the origination fee from funds
available in the account created in subsection (f) of this
section. The loan applicant shall pay the remaining one
percent (1%) of the origination fee from loan proceeds. For
purposes of this paragraph, the office may require an
additional origination fee to be paid by the applicant for
deposit in the account created by subsection (f) of this
section if the additional fee is necessary to account for a
decreased amount of investment earnings as a result of the
emergency bridge loan program;
(ii) Not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($750,000.00) for each business applying under this
chapter;
(iii) Be secured by insurance proceeds or other
anticipated funds that the business will receive as a
result of the natural disaster or other land, equipment or
assets owned by the business;
(iv) Be expended only for any business purposes,
which may include, but not limited to, fencing repair, the
replacement of livestock, the replacement of buildings or
shelters, business vehicles, inventory replacement,
equipment damaged or destroyed in the natural disaster, the
leasing of land for business purposes, necessary trucking
and transportation expenses and temporary facilities for
the business to operate;
(v) Not be expended to expand the business's
operations or to purchase additional property or equipment
that the business did not have before the natural disaster;
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0195
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vi) Contain repayment terms, provided that:
(A) Full repayment shall occur not later
than three (3) years after the issuance of the loan;
(B) Interest shall be charged on the loan
at a rate not to exceed zero percent (0%) plus the interest
rate earned on pooled fund investments in the previous
fiscal year. The interest rate specified in this
subparagraph shall be reduced to account for investment
earnings and the rate of return on investments of the small
business emergency bridge loan account created in
subsection (f) of this section.
(e) Each business receiving a loan under this chapter
shall make repayments to the office. Upon receiving
payments, the office shall deposit the funds received,
including interest, in the small business emergency bridge
loan account created in subsection (f) of this section.
(f) There is created the small business emergency
bridge loan account. Funds within the account shall be used
only to provide emergency bridge loans under this chapter,
origination fees specified in this chapter and any
administrative costs associated with operating the program.
The state treasurer shall invest funds within the account
in accordance with law, and all earnings from the account
shall be deposited in the account. The office may accept
grants, gifts or other funds for deposit in the account.
Any grants, gifts or other funds accepted under this
subsection shall first be expended to reduce, on a pro rata
basis, the interest that applicants are required to pay
under this section. Funds in the account are continuously
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0195
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
appropriated to the office to be expended only in
accordance with this chapter.
(g) Not later than October 1 of each year, the office
shall annually review the program and report to the joint
appropriations committee, the joint agriculture, state and
public lands and water resources interim committee and the
state loan and investment board on the loans made under the
program, all outstanding loan commitments, repayments
received and the balance of the account created in
subsection (f) of this section.
(h) The director of the office of state lands and
investments, with approval from the governor, is authorized
to borrow from the legislative stabilization reserve
account up to twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000.00)
as necessary to meet funding requirements for qualifying
loans under this section. Any loan proceeds shall be
deposited into the small business emergency bridge loan
account. Interest charged on the amounts borrowed shall be
zero percent (0%). The director of the office of state
lands and investments shall report to the joint
appropriations committee, the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives immediately
upon exercise of this loan authority. The director of the
office of state lands and investments, after consultation
with the state auditor, shall include an appropriation
request in each biennial budget and supplemental budget
request in an amount equal to the lesser of twenty-five
million dollars ($25,000,000.00) or the outstanding loan
balance until all loans from the legislative stabilization
reserve account to the emergency bridge loan account are
repaid in full.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0195
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. The office of state lands and investments
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
8